Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2551.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 40, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 40-207, to read: START_STATUTE40-207. Renewable energy resource; electric distribution utilities; definition A. On or before January 1, 2035, electric distribution utilities in this state shall generate at least fifty percent of their electricity from a renewable energy resource. B. For the purposes of this section, "Renewable energy resource": 1. means an energy resource that is self-replenishing by a natural, ongoing process. 2. includes any of the following: (a) Solar energy. (b) Wind energy. (c) Geothermal energy. (d) Hydropower energy. (e) Biofuel energy. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-112, to read: START_STATUTE41-112. Office of resiliency; duties A. The office of resiliency is established in the office of the governor. b. The governor shall appoint a director of the office PURSUANT to section 38-211 who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. c. The director is eligible to receive compensation pursuant to section 38-611. d. The office shall: 1. address the threat of climate change to the water and natural resources of this state. 2. Advise the governor on the areas of water and land use, transportation, energy and other policies as the governor or the director determines are necessary. 3. Develop and periodically update a resiliency plan to protect or improve the resiliency of this state's human population and natural and economic systems against the risks of climate change. 4. Direct state agencies to identify and characterize potential, current and future risks in this state to human, natural and economic systems, including potential risks to all of the following: (a) Water resources. (b) Temperature sensitive populations and systems. (c) Energy systems. (d) Transportation systems. (e) Vital infrastructure and public facilities. (f) Natural lands. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Repeal Title 49, chapter 1, article 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed.